District of Columbia statutes.
5-107.02

Mandatory continuing education program for sworn members of the Metropolitan Police Department.

The Department shall implement a program of continuing education for its sworn members, which shall consist of a minimum of 32 hours of training each year.

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 203, 47 DCR 4619